Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,231
Flashing or rotating lights; authorized emergency vehicles; colors
permitted.

A flashing or rotating red light or red and white
light shall be displayed on any authorized emergency vehicle whenever operated
in this state. A blue light may also be displayed with such flashing or rotating
red light or red and white light. For purposes of this section, an authorized
emergency vehicle shall include funeral escort vehicles.

Laws
1969, c. 327, § 3, p. 1171;

R.S.Supp.,1972, § 39-788.02;

Laws 1989, LB 416, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-6,149;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 327;

Laws 2008, LB196, § 4.